District of Columbia statutes.
13-501

Counterclaim by way of set-off as an action by defendant.

In a civil action, a defendant who files a counterclaim by way of set-off shall be deemed to have brought an action at the time of filing the counterclaim for the matters mentioned therein.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 516, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 13-501.
1973 Ed., § 13-501.